District of Columbia statutes.
39-305

Board of Directors — Powers and reponsibilities.

(a)

The Board shall file such papers as may be required by the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia.

(b)

The Board may appoint such officers and employees as necessary to carry out the purposes of the Museum.

(c)

The Board shall have the power to adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws for operation of the Museum.

(d)

The Board may establish advisory committees to advise the Board and the officers of the Museum.

(e)

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the Board shall encourage community participation from all areas of the City in the planning, development, and promotion of the Museum.

(f)

The Board may appoint ex officio members of the Board.

(g)

A member of the Board may be removed from office by a two-thirds vote of the remaining members of the Board.

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 6, 27 DCR 2546
1981 Ed., § 31-2105.